Utah statutes.
41-1a-204.   Identification number inspection.

An application for first registration in this state of any vehicle may not be accepted by the division unless the  identification number of that vehicle, other than new vehicles sold by dealers licensed in this state, has been inspected by a qualified identification number inspector under Part 8, Identification Numbers.

